Illinois, session 104th, HB2826.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Sections 2-5 and 2-10 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/2-5)7    Sec. 2-5. Multi-township assessors. 8    (a) Qualified townships Townships with less than 1,000 9inhabitants shall not elect assessors for each township but 10shall elect multi-township assessors. 11        (1) If 2 or more qualified townships with less than 12    1,000 inhabitants are contiguous, one multi-township 13    assessor shall be elected to assess the property in as 14    many of the townships as are contiguous and whose combined 15    population equals or exceeds the maximum population amount 16    is 1,000 or more inhabitants. 17        (2) If any qualified township of less than 1,000 18    inhabitants is not contiguous to another qualified 19    township of less than 1,000 inhabitants, one 20    multi-township assessor shall be elected to assess the 21    property of that township and any other township to which 22    it is contiguous.23    (b) If a qualified township is not subject to this Section   HB2826 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 05625 HLH 15655 b1before the publication of population data from the 2030 2federal decennial census, but becomes subject to this Section 3as a result of its population as reflected in 2030 federal 4decennial census, then the provisions of this Section shall 5apply to that qualified township beginning with the first 6general election to occur on or after the publication of 7population data from the 2030 federal decennial census. 8    (c) As used in this Section: 9    "Maximum population amount" means: 10        (1) before the publication of population data from the 11    2030 federal decennial census, 1,000 inhabitants; and 12        (2) on and after the publication of population data 13    from the 2030 federal decennial census, 3,000 inhabitants. 14    "Qualified township" means a township with a population 15that does not exceed the maximum population amount. 16(Source: P.A. 87-818; 88-455.) 17    (35 ILCS 200/2-10)18    Sec. 2-10. Mandatory establishment of multi-township 19assessment districts. Before August 1, 2002 and every 10 20years thereafter, the supervisor of assessments shall prepare 21maps, by county, of the townships, indicating the number of 22inhabitants and the equalized assessed valuation of each 23township for the preceding year, within the counties under 24township organization, and shall distribute a copy of that map 25to the county board and to each township supervisor, board of   HB2826 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 05625 HLH 15655 b1trustees, sitting township or multi-township assessor, and to 2the Department. The map shall contain suggested multi-township 3assessment districts for purposes of assessment. Upon receipt 4of the maps, the boards of trustees shall determine 5separately, by majority vote, if the suggested multi-township 6districts are acceptable.7    The township boards of trustees may meet as a body to 8discuss the suggested districts of which they would be a part. 9Upon request of the township supervisor of any township, the 10township supervisor of the township containing the most 11population shall call the meeting, designating the time and 12place, and shall act as temporary chairperson of the meeting 13until a permanent chairperson is chosen from among the 14township officials included in the call to the meeting. The 15township assessors and supervisor of assessments may 16participate in the meeting. Notice of the meeting shall be 17given in the same manner as notice is required for township 18meetings in the Township Code. The meeting shall be open to the 19public and may be recessed from time to time.20    If a multi-township assessment district is not acceptable 21to any board of trustees, they shall so determine and further 22determine an alternative multi-township assessment district. 23The suggested or alternative multi-township assessment 24district shall contain at least 2 qualified townships, as 25defined in Section 2-5, and 1,000 or more inhabitants, shall 26contain no less than the total area of any one township, shall   HB2826 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 05625 HLH 15655 b1be contiguous to at least one other township in the 2multi-township assessment district, and shall be located 3within one county. For purposes of this Section only, 4townships are contiguous if they share a common boundary line 5or meet at any point. This amendatory Act of 1996 is not a new 6enactment, but is declarative of existing law.7    Before September 15, 2002 and every 10 years thereafter, 8the respective boards of town trustees shall notify the 9supervisor of assessments and the Department whether they have 10accepted the suggested multi-township assessment district or 11whether they have adopted an alternative district, and, in the 12latter case, they shall include in the notification a 13description or map, by township, of the alternative district. 14Before October 1, 2002 and every 10 years thereafter, the 15supervisor of assessments shall determine whether any 16suggested or alternative multi-township assessment district 17meets the conditions of this Section and Section 2-5. If any 18township board of trustees fails to so notify the supervisor 19of assessments and the Department as provided in this Section, 20the township shall be part of the original suggested 21multi-township assessment district. In any dispute between 2 22or more townships as to inclusion or exclusion of a township in 23any one multi-township assessment district, the county board 24shall hold a public hearing in the county seat and, as soon as 25practicable thereafter, make a final determination as to the 26composition of the district. It shall notify the Department of   HB2826 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 05625 HLH 15655 b1the final determination before November 15, 2002 and every 10 2years thereafter. The Department shall promulgate the 3multi-township assessment districts, file the same with the 4Secretary of State as provided in the Illinois Administrative 5Procedure Act and so notify the township supervisors, boards 6of trustees and county clerks of the townships and counties 7subject to this Section and Section 2-5. If the Department's 8promulgation removes a township from a prior multi-township 9assessment district, that township shall, within 30 days after 10the effective date of the removal, receive a distribution of a 11portion of the assets of the prior multi-township assessment 12district according to the ratio of the total equalized 13assessed valuation of all the taxable property in the township 14to the total equalized assessed valuation of all the taxable 15property in the prior multi-township assessment district. If a 16township is removed from one multi-township assessment 17district and made a part of another multi-township assessment 18district, the district from which the township is removed 19shall, within 30 days after the effective date of the removal, 20cause the township's distribution under this paragraph to be 21paid directly to the district of which the township is made a 22part. A township receiving such a distribution (or a 23multi-township assessment district receiving such a 24distribution on behalf of a township that is made a part of 25that district) shall use the proceeds from the distribution 26only in connection with assessing real estate in the township   HB2826 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 05625 HLH 15655 b1for tax purposes.2(Source: P.A. 88-455; incorporates 88-221; 88-670, eff. 312-2-94; 89-502, eff. 6-28-96; 89-695, eff. 12-31-96.) 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 5becoming law.